Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB494.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE IX-ADEPARTMENTAL POWERS AND DUTIES AS TOSMALL PERSONAL CARE HOMESSection 901-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Relative." A parent, child, stepparent, stepchild, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half 12345678910111213141516171819 sister, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew."Small personal care home." As follows:(1) A premises where food, shelter and personal assistance or supervision are provided in exchange for compensation for a period exceeding 24 hours for three or fewer adults who meet the following criteria:(i) They are not relatives of the operator.(ii) They do not require the services of a licensed long-term care facility.(iii) They do require assistance or supervision in such matters as dressing, bathing, diet, financial management, evacuation of a residence in the event of an emergency or medication prescribed for self administration.(2) The term does not include a personal care home as defined in section 1001."Small personal care home administrator." An individual who is charged with the general administration of a small personal care home, whether or not the individual has an ownership interest in the home or the individual's functions and duties are shared with other individuals.Section 902-A. Right of department to enter and inspect. For the purpose of determining the suitability of a small personal care home or whether the small personal care home is in compliance with the regulations promulgated under section 907-A, the following shall apply:(1) In addition to the required annual inspection under section 905-A, an authorized agent of the department may enter, visit and inspect the small personal care home.(2) An authorized agent of the department shall have 20250HB0494PN0483 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 full and free access to the records of the small personal care home and the individuals residing in the small personal care home, including the full opportunity to interview, inspect or examine the individuals.(3) An authorized agent of the department may confer with the small personal care home administrator regarding the minimum standards of the department, encourage the adoption of higher standards and recommend methods of improving care and services.Section 903-A. Duties of small personal care home administrators.A small personal care home administrator shall have the following duties:(1) Maintaining, operating and conducting a small personal care home in accordance with the regulations promulgated under section 907-A.(2) Keeping records and making reports as may be required by the department.Section 904-A. Criminal history record information.No person shall provide assistance or supervision in a small personal care home unless the person submits criminal history record information from the Pennsylvania State Police to the department.Section 905-A. Required annual inspection.The department shall annually conduct at least one unannounced onsite inspection of each small personal care home.Section 906-A. Registry.The department shall establish a small personal care home registry. An individual who seeks to become a small personal care home administrator or is designated as a small personal 20250HB0494PN0483 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care home administrator by the department shall register with the department on a form prescribed by the department.Section 907-A. Regulations. The department shall promulgate regulations establishing minimum standards for building, equipment, operation, care, programs and services, training and staffing of small personal care homes.Section 908-A. Penalties.If a person violates the provisions of this article or regulations promulgated under section 907-A, the department, upon the advice of the Attorney General, may maintain an action in the name of the Commonwealth for an injunction or other process restraining or prohibiting the person from engaging in such activity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0494PN0483 - 4 - 123456789101112131415